Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.900.040

Provisions to be construed in pari materia.

The provisions of this title, Title 28B RCW, shall be construed in pari materia even though as a matter of prior legislative history they were not originally enacted in the same statute. The provisions of this title shall also be construed in pari materia with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, and with other laws relating to education. This section shall not operate retroactively.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.98.040. Formerly RCW 28B.98.040.]